Utah statutes.
46-1-15.   Inspection of journal -- Safekeeping and custody of journal.

If a notary maintains a journal, the notary shall:

(1)  safeguard the journal and all other notarial records as valuable public documents and may not destroy the documents; and

(2)  keep the journal in the exclusive custody of the notary, not to be used by any other notary or surrendered to an employer upon termination of employment.

